Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 10 METROPOLITAN NORTH GEORGIA WATER PLANNING DISTRICT
12-5-585. Education and public awareness.

Any district plan required to include an element of education and public awareness shall describe those measures to be taken by the district and recommendations for measures to be taken by other state agencies or local governments, by public education institutions, or by any other public or semi-public entity. The district shall make these recommendations known to the affected entities and strive to coordinate educational and public awareness efforts. The district's efforts shall be designed to reach 75 to 90 percent of the population in the district within five years.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-585

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 115, § 1.)

12-5-586. Annual report detailing activities and progress.

The district shall submit a written report not later than December 31 of each year to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the chairperson of the House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment, and the chairperson of the Senate Natural Resources and the Environment Committee, which report shall contain a detailed account of the activities and progress of the district throughout the previous year and an accurate accounting of all funds received and expended by the district and of the implementation of plans and attainment of goals.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-586

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 115, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 13/HB 117.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2009, p. 303,

§

20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act."